Idaho, session 2026, H0903.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 56-275, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-275. WAIVER TO ENHANCE NUTRITION IN THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION AS-
SISTANCE PROGRAM. (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Candy" means a shelf-stable preparation of sugar, honey, or other
natural or artificial nutritive or nonnutritive sweeteners in combina-
tion with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or other ingredients or flavorings,
in the form of bars, drops, or pieces. "Candy" shall not include any
preparation containing flour and shall require no requiring refrigera-
tion. or any of the following:
(i) Baked goods such as cookies, cakes, muffins, and brownies;
(ii) Baking ingredients such as sprinkles, chocolate melting
wafers, toffee bits, chocolate chips, etc.;
(iii) Savory or nonsweet snacks such as chips, pretzels, and
crackers;
(iv) Fruit snacks made with real fruit, including fruit puree and
fruit juice concentrate, such as dried mango, apple chips, and
fruit leathers;
(v) Trail mix and products that list peanuts or tree nuts as the
first ingredient;
(vi) Granola bars, breakfast bars, snack bars, protein bars, meal
replacement bars, and weight loss bars; or
(vii) Items used as ingredients in baking such as sugar, honey, and
baking chocolate.
(b) "Soda" means any nonalcoholic beverage that contains natural or ar-
tificial sweeteners. "Soda" does not include any beverages that:
(i) contain Contain milk or milk substitutes,;
(ii) that are Are greater than fifty percent (50%) vegetable juice
or fruit juice by volume,;
(iii) or that require Require preparation before consumption,
such as powders or concentrates.;
(iv) Are sports drinks used for hydration;
(v) Are used as an oral rehydration electrolyte solution formu-
lated to prevent or treat dehydration; or
(vi) Are manufactured as a source of necessary nutrition or di-
etary supplement.


(2) The director of the department of health and welfare shall request a
waiver from the United States department of agriculture to exclude candy and
soda from the definition of eligible foods under 7 CFR 271.2. If such waiver
is granted, then the director shall prohibit the purchase of candy and soda
with benefits provided through the supplemental nutrition assistance pro-
gram. If no such waiver is granted, then the director shall request such a
waiver annually until such waiver is granted.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.